Illinois, session 104th, SB3375.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Section 11-42-10.3 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-42-10.3 new)7    Sec. 11-42-10.3. Commercial operations. The corporate 8authorities of a municipality may license and regulate all 9commercial operations within the municipality's boundaries, 10whether for profit or not for profit, but may not impose any 11tax upon commercial operations except as otherwise authorized 12by law.13    In this Section, "commercial operations" does not include 14(i) an agritourism operation as defined under Section 232 of 15the Illinois Income Tax Act, (ii) an agricultural property as 16defined under Section 232 of the Illinois Income Tax Act, 17(iii) an agribusiness as defined under Section 205-15 of the 18Department of Agriculture Law of the Civil Administrative Code 19of Illinois, (iv) agritourism activities as defined under 20Section 232 of the Illinois Income Tax Act, (v) agricultural 21experiences as defined under Section 5 of the Agricultural 22Experiences Act, or (vi) a pollution control facility as 23defined in Section 3.330 of the Environmental Protection Act.